Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2888.1 of Title 68, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


For an individual who owned a homestead that was purchased by


the Department of Transportation for the construction or expansion


of a turnpike and is claiming a subsequent homestead exemption on a


property, that subsequent homestead shall be initially assigned a


taxable fair cash value in the same amount as the taxable fair cash


value of the prior homestead in the tax year the homestead was


purchased.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2351 QD 1/15/2026 1:40:29 PM



Req. No. 2351 Page 1